src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
# Pite Sámi morphological analyser

This file contains the tags and reference to main lexica

# Multichar_Symbols  definitions

## POS
* +N 	        Noun
* +V 	        Verb
* +A	        Adjective
* +Adv        Adverb
* +CC	        Coordinating conjuction
* +CS	        Subordinating conjuction
* +Interj     Interjection
* +Pron       Pronoun
* +Num        Numeral
* +Pcle       Particle
* +Po	        Postposition
* +Pr	        Preposition

## Subclasses
* +Pers 		   Personal
* +Dem 		   Demonstrative
* +Interr 	   Interrogative
* +Indef 		   Indefinite
* +Refl 		   Reflexive
* +Recipr 	   Reciprocal
* +Rel 		   Relative
* +NomAg		   Agent noun
* +Attr		   Attributive
* +Comp		   Comparative
* +Superl		   Superlative

## Morphosyntactic properties

### Verbal MSP

Tense-mode
* +Prs	   	   Present tense
* +Prt	   	   Preterite (past) tense
* +Ind	   	   Indicative mood
* +Imprt	   	   Imperative mood
* +Pot	   	   Potential mood

Person-number
* +Sg1	   	   First person singular
* +Sg2	   	   Second person singular
* +Sg3	   	   Third person singular
* +Du1	   	   First person dual
* +Du2	   	   Second person dual
* +Du3	   	   Third person dual
* +Pl1	   	   First person plural
* +Pl2	   	   Second person plural
* +Pl3	   	   Third person plural

Infinite forms
* +Inf	   	   Infinitive
* +Neg	   	   Negation verb
* +ConNeg	   	   Connegative verb
* +GerI	   	   Gerund I
* +GerII	   	   Gerund II
* +PrfPrc	   	   Perfect participle
* +PrsPrc	   	   Present participle
* +VAbess	   	   Verb abessive
* +Cmp	   	   Compound
* +TV		   	   Transitive verb
* +IV		   	   Intransitive verb
* +Vsubst	   	   "actio" verb

Other tags
* +ABBR	   	   Abbreviation
* +Symbol = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©
* +Coll	   	   Collocation
* +Cmp/SgNom 	   Compound component using Nominative Singular form
* +Cmp/SgGen 	   Compound component using Genitive Singular form
* +Det	   	   Determiner
* +Clt Clitic 'l for some forms of copula/auxiliary verb following V-final word

Derivation tags
* +Der/NomAg 	   Derived agent noun
* +Der/Dimin 	   Derived diminutive
* +Der/State 	   Derived state noun
* +Der/VAdv 	   Derived deverbal adverb

### Nominal MSP
* +Sg 	   Singular
* +Pl 	   Plural

### Case

* +Nom    Nominative
* +Acc    Accusative
* +Gen    Genitive
* +Ill    Illative
* +Ine    Inessive
* +Ela    Elative
* +Com    Comitative
* +Ess    Essive
* +Abe    Abessive
* +Ord    Ordinal
* +Card   Cardinal

Semantic properties of names

Pssessive suffixes
* +PxSg1     First person singular possessive suffix
* +PxSg2     Second person singular possessive suffix
* +PxSg3     Third person singular possessive suffix
* +PxDu1     First person dual possessive suffix
* +PxDu2     Second person dual possessive suffix
* +PxDu3     Third person dual possessive suffix
* +PxPl1     First person plural possessive suffix
* +PxPl2     Second person plural possessive suffix
* +PxPl3     Third person plural possessive suffix

Other tags
* +Err/Orth      Not part of standard orthography
* +Use/NG        Found in reality, but not generated
* +Use/Circ      
* +Cmp/Hyph      
* +Cmp/SplitR    
* +Use/-Spell    
* +Use/NGminip  
* **+Use/TTS** – **only** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser
* **+Use/-TTS** – **never** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser
* **+Use/PMatch** means that the following is only used in the analyser feeding the disambiguator
* **+Use/-PMatch** Do not include in fst's made for hfst-pmatch

### Compounding tags

The tags are of the following form:
* **+CmpNP/xxx** - Normative (N), Position (P), ie. the tag describes what
position the tagged word can be in in a compound
* **+CmpN/xxx**  - Normative (N) **form** ie. the tag describes what
form the tagged word should use when making compounds
* **+Cmp/xxx**   - Descriptive compounding tags, ie. tags that*describes*
what form a word actually is using in a compound

Normative/prescriptive compounding tags:
(to govern compound behaviour for the speller, ie. what a compound SHOULD BE)

The first part of the component may be ..
* +CmpN/Sg = Singular
* +CmpN/SgN = Singular Nominative
* +CmpN/SgG = Singular Genitive
* +CmpN/PlG = Plural Genitive

* +CmpNP/All - ... be in all positions, **default**, this tag does not have to be written
* +CmpNP/First - ... only be first part in a compound or alone
* +CmpNP/Pref - ... only **first** part in a compound, NEVER alone
* +CmpNP/Last - ... only be last part in a compound or alone
* +CmpNP/Suff - ... only **last** part in a compound, NEVER alone
* +CmpNP/None - ... not take part in compounds
* +CmpNP/Only - ... only be part of a compound, i.e. can never
be used alone, but can appear in any position

* +CmpN/SgLeft  Singular to the left
* +CmpN/SgNomLeft  Singular nominative to the left
* +CmpN/SgGenLeft  Singular genitive to the left
* +CmpN/PlGenLeft  Plural genitive to the left

* **+Cmp/Sg**  Singular
* **+Cmp/SgNom**  Singular Nominative
* **+Cmp/SgGen**  Singular Genitive
* **+Cmp/PlGen**  Plural Genitiv
* **+Cmp/PlNom**  Plural Nominative
* **+Cmp/Attr**  Attribute
* **+Cmp**  Dynamic compound - this tag should always be part of a
dynamic compound.
It is important for Apertium, and useful in other cases as well.
* **+Cmp/SplitR**  This is a split compound with the other part to the right:
"Arbeids- og inkluderingsdepartementet" => Arbeids- = +Cmp/SplitR
* **+Cmp/SplitL**  This is a split compound with the other part to the left
* **+Cmp/Sh**  testing ShCmp

## Punctuation tags
* +CLB      Clause boundary
* +PUNCT    Punctuation
* +LEFT     
* +RIGHT +MIDDLE  
* +SENT     

Morphophonological symbols 

### Symbols for regulating the twolc file

^WG       * weak grade
^G3       * marks grade three for stems w/o Cgrad
^V2E2AA   * e to á (before j), o to u before j in V2
^CDEL     * Deleting final consonant, biednag
^VDEL     * Deleting final V2 vowel in compounds or gájk
^MON      * Monophthong in contract
^UAUML    * uo to uä juolge / juällge
^IEUML    * ie to ä etc. gielbar gællbara
^IUML     * a to i, gallgat gillgin
^IJ       * e to i in front of Plural j and Sg Com
^V2O2U    * o to u in V2 (e.g. Ill.Sg, Dim, some N_ODD) etc.
^MONB4J   * No rules for this one in twolc!

### Archiphonemes
i2   * Variable vowel, does not trigger VH
u2   * Variable vowel, does not trigger VH
ä2   * Variable vowel, does not undergo (further) VH
b2 d2 g2 t2 j2   * Variable consonants, undergo final devoicing or other alternations
^O        * o but ä in uä, a in ua

```
 »7       * »
 «7       * «
 %[%>%]   * >
 %[%<%]   * <
```

## Flag diacritics
We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:
|  @P.NeedNoun.ON@  | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @D.NeedNoun.ON@  | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @C.NeedNoun@  | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised

For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
do no harm.
|  @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@  | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
|  @D.CmpPref.TRUE@  | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
|  @P.CmpPref.FALSE@  | Block these words from making further compounds
|  @D.CmpLast.TRUE@  | Block such words from entering R
|  @D.CmpNone.TRUE@  | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
|  @U.CmpNone.FALSE@  | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
|  @P.CmpOnly.TRUE@  | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
|  @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@  | Disallow words coming directly from root.

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.
|  @U.Cap.Obl@  | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  @U.Cap.Opt@  | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.

The following flag diacritics are used to control case inflection of numbers:

| Flag diacritic | Explanation
| :------------- |:-----------
| @U.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;

The following flag diacritic look-alikes are used in hfst-pmatch/hfst-tokenise to properly
handle (possibly) multitoken single strings.

| Flag | Explanation
| ---- | -----------
|  @P.Pmatch.Loc@ | Used on multi-token analyses; tell hfst-tokenise/pmatch where in the form/analysis the token should be split.
|  @P.Pmatch.Backtrack@ | Used on single-token analyses; tell hfst-tokenise/pmatch to backtrack by reanalysing the substrings before and after this point in the form (to find combinations of shorter analyses that would otherwise be missed)

# Key lexicon
Lexicon Root starts the analyser and directs paths to all POS.

# Lexicon ENDLEX
And this is the ENDLEX of everything:
```
@D.CmpOnly.FALSE@@D.CmpPref.TRUE@@D.NeedNoun.ON@ # ; 
```
The `@D.CmpOnly.FALSE@` flag diacritic is ued to disallow words tagged
with +CmpNP/Only to end here.
The `@D.NeedNoun.ON@` flag diacritic is used to block illegal compounds.

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sje/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
